Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.460

Health care entity—License fee—Requirements—Penalty.

(1) The owner of a health care entity shall pay an original license fee to be determined by the secretary, and annually thereafter, on or before a date to be determined by the secretary, a fee to be determined by the secretary, for which he or she shall receive a license of location, which shall entitle the owner to purchase legend drugs or controlled substances at the location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by the secretary. A declaration of ownership and location filed with the department under this section shall be deemed presumptive evidence of ownership of the health care entity.

(2) The owner shall immediately notify the department of any change of location or ownership in which case a new application and fee shall be submitted.

(3) It shall be the duty of the owner to keep the license of location or the renewal license properly exhibited in the health care entity.

(4) Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor and each day that the failure continues is a separate offense.

(5) In the event that a license fee remains unpaid after the date due, no renewal or new license may be issued except upon payment of the license renewal fee and a penalty fee equal to the original license fee.

[ 1995 c 319 s 4.]